Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-3704
Court appointed special advocate program, defined.

Court appointed special advocate program means a program established pursuant to the Court Appointed Special Advocate Act.

Laws 2000, LB 1167, § 27.